Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 1 Regulation of Hospitals and Related Institutions

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 1172, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “No hospital shall release for public use any autopsy photographs or images without the written permission of the family.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Hospital Mergers, Market Concentration and the Herfindahl-Hirschman Index,” see 33 Emory L.J. 869 (1985).

31-7-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Community Health.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of community health.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Institution” means:

Any building, facility, or place in which are provided two or more beds and other facilities and services that are used for persons received for examination, diagnosis, treatment, surgery, maternity care, nursing care, assisted living care, or personal care for periods continuing for 24 hours or longer and which is classified by the department, as provided for in this chapter, as either a hospital, nursing home, assisted living community, or personal care home;

Any health facility wherein abortion procedures under subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 16-12-141 are performed or are to be performed;

Any building or facility, not under the operation or control of a hospital, which is primarily devoted to the provision of surgical treatment to patients not requiring hospitalization and which is classified by the department as an ambulatory surgical treatment center;

Any fixed or mobile specimen collection center or health testing facility where specimens are taken from the human body for delivery to and examination in a licensed clinical laboratory or where certain measurements such as height and weight determination, limited audio and visual tests, and electrocardiograms are made, excluding public health services operated by the state, its counties, or municipalities;

Any building or facility where human births occur on a regular and ongoing basis and which is classified by the department as a birthing center;

Any building or facility which is devoted to the provision of treatment and rehabilitative care for periods continuing for 24 hours or longer for persons who have traumatic brain injury, as defined in Code Section 37-3-1; or

Any freestanding imaging center where magnetic resonance imaging, computed tomography (CT) scanning, positron emission tomography (PET) scanning, positron emission tomography/computed tomography, and other advanced imaging services as defined by the department by rule, but not including X-rays, fluoroscopy, or ultrasound services, are conducted in a location or setting not affiliated or attached to a hospital or in the offices of an individual private physician or single group practice of physicians and conducted exclusively for patients of that physician or group practice.

The term “institution” shall exclude all physicians’ and dentists’ private offices and treatment rooms in which such physicians or dentists primarily see, consult with, and treat patients.

“Medical facility” means any licensed general hospital, destination cancer hospital, or specialty hospital, institutional infirmary, public health center, or diagnostic and treatment center.

“Permit” means a permit issued by the department upon compliance with the rules and regulations of the department.

“Provisional permit” means a permit issued on a conditional basis for one of the following reasons:

To allow a newly established institution a reasonable but limited period of time to demonstrate that its operational procedures equal standards specified by the rules and regulations of the department; or

To allow an existing institution a reasonable length of time to comply with rules and regulations, provided the institution shall present a plan of improvement acceptable to the department.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1901, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 715, § 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 635, § 3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1757, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1913, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1040, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1982, p. 864, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 22; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1566, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 381, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 31; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-5; Ga. L. 2003, p. 558, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-8/SB 433; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 11/SB 178.

Cross references.

“Personal care home” defined, §

31-7-12

.

Conscious sedation, §

43-11-21

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally Retarded.’ ”

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Orders 04.14.20.01 and 05.12.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

31-7-2.
Classification of institutions.

The department shall classify institutions and adopt and promulgate rules and regulations applicable thereto according to the type of services rendered.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 322, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-1904, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1.

31-7-2.1.
Rules and regulations; availability of reports of cited deficiencies; disclosure of survey worksheets and documents.

The department shall adopt and promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations which in its judgment are necessary to protect the health and lives of patients and shall prescribe and set out the kind and quality of building, equipment, facilities, and institutional services which institutions shall have and use in order to properly care for their patients. Such rules and regulations shall include detailed quality standards for specific clinical services which shall be required to be met by an institution prior to offering the particular service. Such rules and regulations shall require that all nursing homes annually offer unless contraindicated, contingent on availability, an influenza virus vaccine to all medicare and Medicaid-eligible patients and private-pay patients in their facilities, in accordance with the rules and regulations established pursuant to this subsection. Such rules and regulations shall also require that all nursing homes annually offer unless contraindicated, contingent on availability, a pneumococcal bacteria vaccine to all medicare-eligible patients and all private-pay patients, 65 years of age or older, in their facilities, in accordance with the rules and regulations established pursuant to this subsection.

The department shall compile and distribute, upon request, to interested persons a monthly list of those nursing homes and intermediate care homes surveyed, inspected, or investigated during the month, indicating each facility for which deficiencies have been cited by the department, and indicating where reports of the cited deficiencies and information regarding any sanctions imposed can be obtained. The department shall also make available the survey reports upon written request.

Except as provided in Code Sections 31-8-86 and 31-5-5, all worksheets or documents prepared or compiled by department surveyors in the course of nursing home surveys shall be provided upon written request to a nursing home which has received notice of intent to impose a remedy or sanction pursuant to 42 U.S.C. Section 1396r or Code Section 31-2-8; provided, however, that the names of residents and any other information that would reveal the identities of residents and the content of resident interviews shall not be disclosed except as provided in survey protocols of the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The department may charge a reasonable reproduction fee as provided in Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-1903, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1603, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1024, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 31; Ga. L. 2004, p. 443, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-9/SB 433; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-9/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-7/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2003, an extra “the” was deleted preceding “federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services” near the end of the first sentence in subsection (c).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, a hyphen was inserted twice between the words “private pay” and once between the words “Medicaid eligible” and the words “medicare eligible” in the second and third sentence of subsection (a).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, “Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.” was substituted for “ Code Section 50-18-70 et seq.” in the last sentence of subsection (c).

U.S. Code.

Requirements for nursing facilities,

42 U.S.C. § 1396

r.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 74 (1992).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-7-2.2.
Determination that patients or residents in an institution, community living arrangement, or treatment program are in danger; relocation of patients or residents; suspension of admissions.

The commissioner may order the emergency relocation of patients or residents from an institution subject to licensure under this chapter, a community living arrangement subject to licensure under paragraph (8) of subsection (d) of Code Section 31-2-4, or a drug abuse treatment and education program subject to licensure under Chapter 5 of Title 26 when the commissioner has determined that the patients or residents are subject to an imminent and substantial danger.

When an order is issued under this subsection, the commissioner shall provide for:

Notice to the patient or resident, his or her next of kin or guardian, and his or her physician of the emergency relocation and the reasons therefor;

Relocation to the nearest appropriate institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program; and

Other protection designed to ensure the welfare and, when possible, the desires of the patient or resident.

The health, safety, security, rights, or welfare of the patients or residents cannot be adequately assured by the institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program.

The commissioner may order the emergency placement of a monitor in an institution subject to licensure under this chapter, a community living arrangement subject to licensure under paragraph (8) of subsection (d) of Code Section 31-2-4, or a drug abuse treatment and education program subject to licensure under Chapter 5 of Title 26 when one or more of the following conditions are present:

A monitor may be placed, pursuant to this subsection, in an institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program for no more than ten days, during which time the monitor shall observe conditions and compliance with any recommended remedial action of the department by the institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program. The monitor shall report to the department. The monitor shall not assume any administrative responsibility within the institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program nor shall the monitor be liable for any actions of the institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program. The costs of placing a monitor in an institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program shall be paid by the institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program unless the order placing the monitor is determined to be invalid in a contested case proceeding under subsection (d) of this Code section, in which event the costs shall be paid by the state.

The commissioner may order the emergency prohibition of admissions to an institution subject to licensure under this chapter, a community living arrangement subject to licensure under paragraph (8) of subsection (d) of Code Section 31-2-4, or program subject to licensure under Chapter 5 of Title 26 when such institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program has failed to correct a violation of departmental permit rules or regulations within a reasonable period of time, as specified in the department’s corrective order, and the violation:

Could jeopardize the health and safety of the residents or patients in the institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program if allowed to remain uncorrected; or

Is a repeat violation over a 12 month period, which is intentional or due to gross negligence.

Admission to an institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program may be suspended until the violation has been corrected or until the department has determined that the institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program has undertaken the action necessary to effect correction of the violation.

The commissioner may issue emergency orders pursuant to this Code section only if authorized by rules and regulations of the department. Unless otherwise provided in the order, an emergency order shall become effective immediately. The department shall hold a preliminary hearing within ten days following a request therefor by any institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program affected by an emergency order. If at the preliminary hearing the order is determined by the department to be invalid, that order shall thereupon become void and of no effect. If at the preliminary hearing the order is determined by the department to be valid, that determination shall constitute a contested case under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and that order shall remain in effect until determined invalid in a proceeding regarding the contested case or until rescinded by the commissioner, whichever is earlier. For purposes of this subsection, an emergency order is valid only if the order is authorized to be issued under this Code section and rules and regulations relating thereto.

The powers provided by this Code section are cumulative of all other powers of the department, board, and commissioner.

(A)

The institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program is operating without a permit or a license;

(B)

The department has denied application for a permit or a license or has initiated action to revoke the existing permit or license of the institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program;

(C)

The institution, community living arrangement, or drug abuse treatment and education program is closing or plans to close and adequate arrangements for relocation of the patients or residents have not been made at least 30 days before the date of closure; or

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-2.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1323, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 558, § 3; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-26/HB 228.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Monitoring, suspension of admissions, or transfer of patients or residents of hospitals and related institutions, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Public Health, Chapter 290-5-44.

31-7-3.
Requirements for permits to operate institutions.

Any person or persons responsible for the operation of any institution, or who may hereafter propose to establish and operate an institution and to provide specified clinical services, shall submit an application to the department for a permit to operate the institution and provide such services, such application to be made on forms prescribed by the department. No institution shall be operated in this state without such a permit, which shall be displayed in a conspicuous place on the premises. No clinical services shall be provided by an institution except as approved by the department in accordance with the rules and regulations established pursuant to Code Section 31-7-2.1. Failure or refusal to file an application for a permit shall constitute a violation of this chapter and shall be dealt with as provided for in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title. Following inspection and classification of the institution for which a permit is applied for, the department may issue or refuse to issue a permit or a provisional permit. Permits issued shall remain in force and effect until revoked or suspended; provisional permits issued shall remain in force and effect for such limited period of time as may be specified by the department. Upon conclusion of the Atlantic Cardiovascular Patient Outcomes Research Team (C-PORT) Study, the department shall consider and analyze the data and conclusions of the study and promulgate rules pursuant to Code Section 31-7-2.1 to regulate the quality of care for therapeutic cardiac catheterization. All hospitals that participated in the study and are exempt from obtaining a certificate of need based on paragraph (22) of subsection (a) of Code Section 31-6-47 shall apply for a permit to continue providing therapeutic cardiac catheterization services once the department promulgates the rules required by this Code section.

The department may accept the certification or accreditation of an institution by the American Osteopathy Association or a nationally recognized health care accreditation body, in accordance with specific standards, as evidence of that institution’s compliance with the substantially equivalent departmental requirements for issuance or renewal of a permit or provisional permit, provided that such certification or accreditation is established prior to the issuance or renewal of such permits. The department may not require an additional departmental inspection of any institution whose certification or accreditation has been accepted by the department, except to the extent that such specific standards are less rigorous or less comprehensive than departmental requirements. Nothing contained in this Code section shall prohibit departmental inspections for violations of such standards or requirements nor shall it prohibit the revocation of or refusal to issue or renew permits, as authorized by Code Section 31-7-4, or for violation of any other applicable law or regulation pursuant thereto.

The department shall require a facility licensed under this article and rules and regulations adopted pursuant thereto to have a written and regularly rehearsed disaster preparedness plan, approved by the department, for staff and residents to follow in case of fire, explosion, or other emergency, including interruption of electrical power supply, gas-heating supply, and water supply. The plan shall include written procedures for personnel to follow in an emergency including care of the resident; notification of attending physician and other persons responsible for the resident; and arrangements for transportation, for hospitalization, for alternate living arrangements, for emergency energy sources, or for other appropriate services.

When an application for licensure to operate a personal care home, as defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 31-7-12, or an assisted living community, as defined in Code Section 31-7-12.2, has been made, the department shall inform the office of the state long-term care ombudsman of the name and address of the applicant prior to issuing authority to operate or receive residents and shall provide to the ombudsman program an opportunity to provide to the department information relevant to the applicant’s fitness to operate as a licensed personal care home or an assisted living community.

The department may consider any information provided under this subsection, where verified by appropriate licensing procedures, in determining whether an applicant meets the requirements for licensing.

The department shall promulgate regulations setting forth the procedures by which the long-term care ombudsman program shall report information to the department or its designee as required by this subsection, including a consistent format for the reporting of information, safeguards to protect confidentiality, and specified types of information which shall be routinely provided by the long-term care ombudsman program.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to provide any authority to the long-term care ombudsman program to license or refuse to license the operation of a personal care home or an assisted living community.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 34, § 3; Ga. L. 1958, p. 322, § 3; Code 1933, § 88-1905, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 920, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 783, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1358, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-10/SB 433; Ga. L. 2011, p. 227, § 12/SB 178; Ga. L. 2012, p. 337, § 2/SB 361.

Cross references.

Certificate of need required for offering health care and exemptions, §

31-6-40

et seq.

31-7-3.1.
Posting sign by hospital operating emergency room notifying individuals of legal rights in emergencies.

As a condition of obtaining or retaining the permit required by Code Section 31-7-3 to operate such institution, any hospital which operates an emergency room shall post conspicuously therein a sign notifying the public of the rights of individuals under federal or state law with respect to examination and treatment for emergency medical conditions and women in active labor.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1810, § 1.

31-7-3.2.
Notice of cited deficiency and imposition of sanction.

A personal care home, assisted living community, nursing home, or intermediate care home licensed under this article shall give notice in the event that such facility has been cited by the department for any deficiency for which the facility has received notice of the imposition of any sanction available under federal or state laws or regulations, except where a plan of correction is the only sanction to be imposed.

A notice required under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be of a size and format prescribed by the department and shall contain the following:

A list of each cited deficiency which has resulted in the notice being required;

A description of any actions taken by or of any notices of intent to take action issued by federal or state entities as a result of such cited deficiencies;

The telephone numbers of the state and community long-term care ombudsman programs; and

A statement that a copy of the notice may be obtained upon written request accompanied by a self-addressed stamped envelope.

A notice required by subsection (a) of this Code section shall be posted at the facility giving the notice:

In an area readily accessible and continuously visible to the facility’s residents and their representatives;

Within 14 days after the facility receives notification of imposition of a sanction for a cited deficiency which requires the notice; and

Until the department has determined such cited deficiencies no longer exist, at which time the notice may be removed.

In addition to the posted notice required by subsection (c) of this Code section, a notice, containing the information set forth in subsection (b) of this Code section, shall also be provided by the facility upon written request. The facility shall be responsible for mailing a copy of such notice when the written request is accompanied by a postage paid self-addressed envelope.

Each applicant to a facility shall receive upon written request with his application a copy of the most recent notice which has been distributed pursuant to this subsection. The facility may inform the applicant of any corrective actions taken in response to the cited deficiencies contained in such notice.

In the event that the facility previously has been required to have posted or provided notice of the same cited deficiency arising from the same act, occurrence, or omission, this Code section should not be construed to require the facility to post or provide duplicate notice of such cited deficiency so long as the notice is made in a manner consistent with subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section.

In the case of a violation of this Code section, the department may impose administrative sanctions as otherwise provided by law in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

The department may promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this Code section.

No violation of any regulation promulgated pursuant to the federal Nursing Home Reform Act, 42 U.S.C. Sections 1396r and 1395i-3, or any regulation included in Ga. Comp. R. & Regs. 111-8-50 or 111-8-56 or the successor of such regulations as they existed on May 12, 2015, shall constitute negligence per se; provided, however, that the court in any civil action shall take judicial notice of these regulations and admit them into evidence if found to be relevant to the harm alleged in the complaint. Nothing in this subsection shall abrogate any express cause of action authorized under law or be construed to amend or repeal any provision of the “Bill of Rights for Residents of Long-term Care Facilities” in Article 5 of Chapter 8 of this title.

The results or findings of a federal or state survey or inspection of a nursing home facility, including any statement of deficiencies or reports, shall not be used or referenced in an advertisement or solicitation by any person or any entity, unless the advertisement or solicitation includes all of the following:

The date the survey was conducted;

A statement that the Department of Community Health conducts a survey of all nursing home facilities at least once every 15 months;

If a finding or deficiency cited in the statement of deficiencies has been substantially corrected, a statement that the finding or deficiency has been substantially corrected and the date that the finding or deficiency was substantially corrected;

The number of findings and deficiencies cited in the statement of deficiencies on the basis of the survey and a disclosure of the severity level for each finding and deficiency;

The average number of findings and deficiencies cited in statements of deficiencies on the basis of surveys conducted by the department during the same calendar year as the survey used in the advertisement;

A disclosure of whether each finding or deficiency caused actual bodily harm to any residents and the number of residents harmed thereby; and

A statement that the advertisement is neither authorized nor endorsed by any government agency.

In addition to any other remedies and damages allowed by law, a party found to have violated paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be liable for attorney fees and expenses of litigation incurred in an action to restrain or enjoin such violation; provided, however, that damages, attorney fees, and expenses of litigation shall not be recoverable against any newspaper, news outlet, or broadcaster publishing an advertisement or solicitation submitted by a third party for a fee.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-3.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1991, p. 1603, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1315, § 1/HB 342; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 31/HB 737; Ga. L. 2020, p. 95, § 4/HB 987.

The 2020 amendment,

effective June 30, 2020, added “personal care home, assisted living community” and inserted a comma after nursing home near the beginning of subsection (a).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, “May 12, 2015” was substituted for “the effective date of this subsection” in the first sentence of subsection (i).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1315, § 2/HB 342, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval and shall apply to all causes of actions arising on and after such date.”

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 enactment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 74 (1992).

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 257 (2015).

31-7-3.3.
“Excluded party” defined; liability; notice; dismissal; other procedural factors.

As used in this Code section, the term “excluded party” means a person or entity that neither performs, has the duty to perform, nor controls the performance of any of the following functions at or on behalf of a nursing home or intermediate care home where alleged injuries occurred:

Providing management, operation, or administrative services for such home;

Hiring or firing of the administrator, director of nursing, or other staff working at such home;

Setting or controlling the budget of such home;

Staffing or determining the level of staff at such home;

Providing direct care, treatment, or services to the residents of such home;

Making decisions regarding the care, treatment, or services provided to residents at such home; or

Adopting, implementing, or enforcing the policies and procedures for such home.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the mere ownership of an entity shall not, by itself, create the duty to perform the functions listed in subsection (a) of this Code section.

An excluded party shall not be named in a civil action that alleges its direct or vicarious liability for the personal injury or death of one or more residents of a nursing home or intermediate care home or a violation of residents’ rights at such home under Article 5 of Chapter 8 of this title.

Any person or entity named as a defendant in a civil action or arbitration, that claims to be an excluded party, may serve a notice of such claim upon the plaintiff. Such notice shall be sent to counsel for the plaintiff by certified mail, return receipt requested, or, if the plaintiff does not have an attorney, to the plaintiff personally via certified mail, return receipt requested. Such notice shall be served after the discovery period begins under applicable law for the case but not later than 30 days after such discovery period begins.

If, after the expiration of 90 days from the date the notice described in subsection (d) of this Code section is received, the plaintiff does not agree to a dismissal without prejudice of such defendant claiming to be an excluded party, and:

The court later determines that there is no genuine issue of material fact as to whether such defendant is an excluded party, grants summary judgment to such defendant as to this issue, and such order becomes final after any appeal; or

If an arbitrator enters judgment for such defendant as to this issue and determines that there was not a good faith basis in law and fact for the plaintiff’s claim that such defendant was not an excluded party and such order becomes final after any appeal,

then such finding by an arbitrator or final judgment by a court shall be deemed a finding that the plaintiff’s claim against such defendant was substantially frivolous, substantially groundless, or substantially vexatious. Upon such a final judgment or finding, such excluded party shall be entitled to an award of reasonable and necessary attorneys’ fees and expenses of litigation upon the filing of a motion. The court or arbitrator shall award only such reasonable and necessary attorneys’ fees and expenses of litigation as the court or arbitrator determines were related to the defense of only such excluded party and not to the defense of other defendants in such action, unless otherwise authorized by law. Such attorneys’ fees and expenses so awarded shall be assessed against the party asserting such claim, against such party’s attorney, or against both in such manner as is just.

In the event that the plaintiff prevails on any claim against a defendant claiming to be an excluded party and if the court or an arbitrator determines that there was not a good faith basis in law and fact for the defendant’s claim that such defendant was an excluded party, and such order becomes final after appeal, then such judgment by a court or arbitrator shall be deemed a finding that the contention by such defendant that it was an excluded party was substantially frivolous, substantially groundless, or substantially vexatious. Upon such a final judgment or finding, the plaintiff shall be entitled to an award of reasonable and necessary attorneys’ fees and expenses of litigation upon the filing of a motion. The court or arbitrator shall award only such reasonable and necessary attorneys’ fees and expenses of litigation that were incurred in the pursuit of the action against the defendant claiming to be an excluded party, and the plaintiff shall not be entitled to an award of reasonable and necessary attorneys’ fees and expenses of litigation that were incurred in the pursuit of the action against other defendants, unless otherwise authorized by law. Such attorneys’ fees and expenses so awarded shall be assessed against the party asserting such claim, against such party’s attorney, or against both in such manner as is just.

Notwithstanding Code Section 51-7-85, subsections (e) and (f) of this Code section shall be in addition to and shall not limit a party’s right to pursue a recovery pursuant to Code Section 9-15-14 or Article 5 of Chapter 7 of Title 51.

The time period set forth in subsection (e) of this Code section may be extended by agreement of the parties or by order of the court; provided, however, that if during such time period any party files a motion to stay the case or a motion to compel arbitration, such time period shall be extended for 30 days following the date the court rules on such motion; and provided, further, that if any party files a motion to compel discovery, such period shall be extended until 30 days following the date that the party complies with the court’s order to produce discovery, whichever is later.

A defendant which is a licensee shall not identify an excluded party as a potentially at-fault nonparty for purposes of apportionment under Code Section 51-12-33, unless such nonparty has entered into a settlement agreement with the plaintiff or claimant.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-3.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 550, § 1/HB 920; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 31/HB 323.

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “its direct” for “their direct” near the beginning of subsection (c); substituted “that claims” for “who claims” in the first sentence of subsection (d); and substituted “such claim,” for “such claim, or” near the end of the last sentence of the ending undesignated paragraph in subsection (e) and near the middle of the last sentence of subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 550, § 2/HB 920, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section applicable to any claim filed on or after July 1, 2016.

31-7-3.4.
Carrying of liability insurance or establishment of self-insurance
trust as condition precedent to obtaining or maintaining permit.

As used in this Code section, the term “nursing home claim” means a claim alleging direct or vicarious liability for the personal injury or death of one or more residents of a nursing home or intermediate care home or a violation of residents’ rights at such home under Article 5 of Chapter 8 of this title.

As a condition precedent to obtaining or maintaining a permit under this article to operate a nursing home or intermediate care home, a licensee shall carry or be covered by liability insurance coverages or establish or have established for its benefit a self-insurance trust for a nursing home claim.

If a licensee fails to carry or be covered by liability insurance coverages or establish or have established for its benefit a self-insurance trust for a nursing home claim, the department shall provide notice to such licensee of its noncompliance and allow such licensee 60 days in which to comply. A licensee’s failure to maintain such coverage or establish such trust shall result in the department:

Revoking such licensee’s permit issued pursuant to this article to operate the nursing home or intermediate care home;

Denying any application to renew such permit; and

Denying any application for a change of ownership of the nursing home or intermediate care home.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-3.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 550, § 1/HB 920.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 550, § 2/HB 920, not codified by the General Assembly, makes this Code section appli- cable to any claim filed on or after July 1, 2016.

31-7-4.
Denial or revocation of permits.

The department may refuse to grant a permit as provided for in Code Section 31-7-3 for the operation of any institution that does not fulfill the minimum requirements which the department may prescribe by rules and regulations, may revoke a permit which has been issued if an institution violates any of such rules and regulations, and may revoke a portion of a permit which has been issued as it relates to a specific clinical service if the quality standards established by the department pursuant to Code Section 31-7-2.1 for such clinical service are not met; provided, however, that before any order is entered refusing a permit applied for or revoking a permit previously granted, the applicant or permit holder, as the case may be, shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing as provided for in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title. All appeals from such orders and all rights of enforcement by injunction shall be governed by Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 34, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1958, p. 322, § 3; Code 1933, § 88-1906, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-11/SB 433.

31-7-5.
Exemptions from permit requirements; application of this chapter to federally operated institutions.

Code Section 31-7-3 shall not apply to the offices of physicians or others practicing the healing arts unless the facilities and services described in paragraph (4) of Code Section 31-7-1 are provided therein; nor shall this chapter apply to institutions operated exclusively by the federal government or by any of its agencies.

History.

Ga. L. 1946, p. 34, § 6; Code 1933, § 88-1907, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-12/SB 433.